Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2708
Sales and use tax; returns; date due; failure to file; penalty; deduction; amount; claim for refund; allowance; disallowance; proceedings; Tax Commissioner; duties regarding refund.

(1)(a) The sales and use taxes imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall be due and payable to the Tax Commissioner monthly on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding each monthly period unless otherwise provided pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

(b)(i) On or before the twentieth day of the month following each monthly period or such other period as the Tax Commissioner may require, a return for such period, along with all taxes due, shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner in such form and content as the Tax Commissioner may prescribe and containing such information as the Tax Commissioner deems necessary for the proper administration of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner, if he or she deems it necessary in order to insure payment to or facilitate the collection by the state of the amount of sales or use taxes due, may require returns and payment of the amount of such taxes for periods other than monthly periods in the case of a particular seller, retailer, or purchaser, as the case may be. The Tax Commissioner shall by rule and regulation require reports and tax payments from sellers, retailers, or purchasers depending on their yearly tax liability. Except as required by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, annual returns shall be required if such sellers', retailers', or purchasers' yearly tax liability is less than nine hundred dollars, quarterly returns shall be required if their yearly tax liability is nine hundred dollars or more and less than three thousand dollars, and monthly returns shall be required if their yearly tax liability is three thousand dollars or more. The Tax Commissioner shall have the discretion to allow an annual return for seasonal retailers, even when their yearly tax liability exceeds the amounts listed in this subdivision.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to allow annual, semiannual, or quarterly returns for any retailer making monthly remittances or payments of sales and use taxes by electronic funds transfer or for any retailer remitting tax to the state pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Such rules and regulations may establish a method of determining the amount of the payment that will result in substantially all of the tax liability being paid each quarter. At least once each year, the difference between the amount paid and the amount due shall be reconciled. If the difference is more than ten percent of the amount paid, a penalty of fifty percent of the unpaid amount shall be imposed.

(ii) For purposes of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every retailer liable for collection from a purchaser and payment to the state of the tax, except that a combined sales tax return may be filed for all licensed locations which are subject to common ownership. For purposes of this subdivision, common ownership means the same person or persons own eighty percent or more of each licensed location. For purposes of the use tax, a return shall be filed by every retailer engaged in business in this state and by every person who has purchased property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the use tax, but who has not paid the use tax due to a retailer required to collect the tax.

(iii) The Tax Commissioner may require that returns be signed by the person required to file the return or by his or her duly authorized agent but need not be verified by oath.

(iv) A taxpayer who keeps his or her regular books and records on a cash basis, an accrual basis, or any generally recognized accounting basis which correctly reflects the operation of the business may file the sales and use tax returns required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 on the same accounting basis that is used for the regular books and records, except that on credit, conditional, and installment sales, the retailer who keeps his or her books on an accrual basis may report such sales on the cash basis and pay the tax upon the collections made during each month. If a taxpayer transfers, sells, assigns, or otherwise disposes of an account receivable, he or she shall be deemed to have received the full balance of the consideration for the original sale and shall be liable for the remittance of the sales tax on the balance of the total sale price not previously reported, except that such transfer, sale, assignment, or other disposition of an account receivable by a retailer to a subsidiary shall not be deemed to require the retailer to pay the sales tax on the credit sale represented by the account transferred prior to the time the customer makes payment on such account. If the subsidiary does not obtain a Nebraska sales tax permit, the taxpayer shall obtain a surety bond in favor of the State of Nebraska to insure payment of the tax and any interest and penalty imposed thereon under this section in an amount not less than two times the amount of tax payable on outstanding accounts receivable held by the subsidiary as of the end of the prior calendar year. Failure to obtain either a sales tax permit or a surety bond in accordance with this section shall result in the payment on the next required filing date of all sales taxes not previously remitted. When the retailer has adopted one basis or the other of reporting credit, conditional, or installment sales and paying the tax thereon, he or she will not be permitted to change from that basis without first having notified the Tax Commissioner.

(c) Except as provided in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the taxpayer required to file the return shall deliver or mail any required return together with a remittance of the net amount of the tax due to the office of the Tax Commissioner on or before the required filing date. Failure to file the return, filing after the required filing date, failure to remit the net amount of the tax due, or remitting the net amount of the tax due after the required filing date shall be cause for a penalty, in addition to interest, of ten percent of the amount of tax not paid by the required filing date or twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater, unless the penalty is being collected under subdivision (1)(i), (1)(j)(i), or (1)(k)(i) of section 77-2703 by a county treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles, in which case the penalty shall be five dollars.

(d) The taxpayer shall deduct and withhold, from the taxes otherwise due from him or her on his or her tax return, two and one-half percent of the first three thousand dollars remitted each month to reimburse himself or herself for the cost of collecting the tax. Taxpayers filing a combined return as allowed by subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this subsection shall compute such collection fees on the basis of the receipts and liability of each licensed location. If a model 1 seller's sales and use tax functions are performed by a certified service provider and the certified service provider is compensated pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement for performing such functions, then the model 1 seller shall not receive any collection fees under this subdivision.

(e) A retailer that makes sales into Nebraska using a multivendor marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to collect and remit sales taxes to Nebraska with regard to any sales taxes collected and remitted by the multivendor marketplace platform. Such a retailer must include all sales into Nebraska in its gross receipts in its return, but may claim credit for any sales taxes collected and remitted by the multivendor marketplace platform with respect to such retailer's sales. Such retailer is liable for the sales tax due on sales into Nebraska as provided in section 77-2704.35.

(f) A multivendor marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to collect and remit the correct amount of state and local sales taxes to Nebraska to the extent that the multivendor marketplace platform can establish that the error was due to insufficient or incorrect information given to the multivendor marketplace platform by the seller and relied on by the multivendor marketplace platform. This subdivision shall not apply if the multivendor marketplace platform and the seller are related persons under either section 267(b) or (c) or section 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or if the seller is also the multivendor marketplace platform operator.

(2)(a) If the Tax Commissioner determines that any sales or use tax amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once, has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, or has been paid and the purchaser qualifies for a refund under section 77-2708.01, the Tax Commissioner shall set forth that fact in his or her records and the excess amount collected or paid may be credited on any sales, use, or income tax amounts then due and payable from the person under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Any balance may be refunded to the person by whom it was paid or his or her successors, administrators, or executors.

(b) No refund shall be allowed unless a claim therefor is filed with the Tax Commissioner by the person who made the overpayment or his or her attorney, executor, or administrator within three years from the required filing date following the close of the period for which the overpayment was made, within six months after any determination becomes final under section 77-2709, or within six months from the date of overpayment with respect to such determinations, whichever of these three periods expires later, unless the credit relates to a period for which a waiver has been given. Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this subsection shall constitute a waiver of any demand against the state on account of overpayment.

(c) Every claim shall be in writing on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and shall state the specific amount and grounds upon which the claim is founded. No refund shall be made in any amount less than two dollars.

(d) The Tax Commissioner shall allow or disallow a claim within one hundred eighty days after it has been filed. A request for a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the one-hundred-eighty-day period. The claimant and the Tax Commissioner may also agree to extend the one-hundred-eighty-day period. If a hearing has not been requested and the Tax Commissioner has neither allowed nor disallowed a claim within either the one hundred eighty days or the period agreed to by the claimant and the Tax Commissioner, the claim shall be deemed to have been allowed.

(e) Within thirty days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part, the Tax Commissioner shall serve notice of his or her action on the claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(f) Within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of the Tax Commissioner's action upon a claim filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the action of the Tax Commissioner shall be final unless the taxpayer seeks review of the Tax Commissioner's determination as provided in section 77-27,127.

(g) Upon the allowance of a credit or refund of any sum erroneously or illegally assessed or collected, of any penalty collected without authority, or of any sum which was excessive or in any manner wrongfully collected, interest shall be allowed and paid on the amount of such credit or refund at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, from the date such sum was paid or from the date the return was required to be filed, whichever date is later, to the date of the allowance of the refund or, in the case of a credit, to the due date of the amount against which the credit is allowed, but in the case of a voluntary and unrequested payment in excess of actual tax liability or a refund under section 77-2708.01, no interest shall be allowed when such excess is refunded or credited.

(h) No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(i) The Tax Commissioner may recover any refund or part thereof which is erroneously made and any credit or part thereof which is erroneously allowed by issuing a deficiency determination within one year from the date of refund or credit or within the period otherwise allowed for issuing a deficiency determination, whichever expires later.

(j)(i) Credit shall be allowed to the retailer, contractor, or repairperson for sales or use taxes paid pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 on any deduction taken that is attributed to bad debts not including interest. Bad debt has the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. 166, as such section existed on January 1, 2003. However, the amount calculated pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 166 shall be adjusted to exclude: Financing charges or interest; sales or use taxes charged on the purchase price; uncollectible amounts on property that remains in the possession of the seller until the full purchase price is paid; and expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt and repossessed property.

(ii) Bad debts may be deducted on the return for the period during which the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant's books and records and is eligible to be deducted for federal income tax purposes. A claimant who is not required to file federal income tax returns may deduct a bad debt on a return filed for the period in which the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant's books and records and would be eligible for a bad debt deduction for federal income tax purposes if the claimant was required to file a federal income tax return.

(iii) If a deduction is taken for a bad debt and the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the amount so collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the period in which the collection is made.

(iv) When the amount of bad debt exceeds the amount of taxable sales for the period during which the bad debt is written off, a refund claim may be filed within the otherwise applicable statute of limitations for refund claims. The statute of limitations shall be measured from the due date of the return on which the bad debt could first be claimed.

(v) If filing responsibilities have been assumed by a certified service provider, the service provider may claim, on behalf of the retailer, any bad debt allowance provided by this section. The certified service provider shall credit or refund the full amount of any bad debt allowance or refund received to the retailer.

(vi) For purposes of reporting a payment received on a previously claimed bad debt, any payments made on a debt or account are applied first proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the sales tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges, and any other charges.

(vii) In situations in which the books and records of the party claiming the bad debt allowance support an allocation of the bad debts among the member states in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the state shall permit the allocation.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2020, if a refund claim under this section involves a refund of a tax imposed under the Local Option Revenue Act or section 13-319, 13-2813, or 77-6403 and the amount of such tax to be refunded is at least five thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the affected city, village, county, or municipal county of such claim within twenty days after receiving the claim. If the Tax Commissioner allows the claim and the refund of such tax is at least five thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the affected city, village, county, or municipal county of such refund and shall give the city, village, county, or municipal county the option of having such refund deducted from its tax proceeds in one lump sum or in twelve equal monthly installments. The city, village, county, or municipal county shall make its selection and shall certify the selection to the Tax Commissioner within twenty days after receiving notice of the refund. The Tax Commissioner shall then deduct such refund from the applicable tax proceeds in accordance with the selection when he or she deducts refunds pursuant to section 13-324, 13-2814, or 77-6403 or subsection (1) of section 77-27,144, whichever is applicable. This subsection shall not apply to any refund that is subject to subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(b)(ii) or subsection (3) or (4) of section 77-27,144.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 8, p. 1558;

Laws 1967, c. 490, § 5, p. 1665;

Laws 1969, c. 683, § 5, p. 2635;

Laws 1976, LB 996, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 179, § 15;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 51;

Laws 1982, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 101, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 571, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 758, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 715, § 7;

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 46;

Laws 1987, LB 775, § 15;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 1234, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 23;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 183;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 156;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 128, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 56;

Laws 1995, LB 9, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 118, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1041, § 7;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 32, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 71;

Laws 2005, LB 216, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 99;

Laws 2014, LB814, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB745, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB284, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB472, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB984, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB1150, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB208, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 39.

Local Option Revenue Act, see section 77-27,148.

Section 77-2703 places the legal incidence of admissions taxes on the consumer, not the retailer. Therefore, the consumer, and not the retailer, has standing to claim a refund of admissions taxes under this section. Aline Bae Tanning v. Nebraska Dept. of Rev., 293 Neb. 623, 880 N.W.2d 61 (2016).

A late filing cannot be excused on equitable grounds where the claim was time barred because it was filed beyond the limitations period specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section, as extended by agreement of the parties. Becton, Dickinson & Co. v. Nebraska Dept. of Rev., 276 Neb. 640, 756 N.W.2d 280 (2008).

The sales and use tax return contains instructions stating that the entries for each tax remain separate and that the failure to enter "a word, statement, number or figure . . . in the appropriate lines on the return" extends the statute of limitations to 5 years. Where no such entries were made, the department was not given adequate information from which to compute the consumer's use tax owed and the 5-year statute of limitations controls. McDonald's Exec. Off. v. Nebraska Dept. of Revenue, 243 Neb. 82, 497 N.W.2d 377 (1993).

Use tax is payable only once. Omaha P. P. Dist. v. Nebraska State Tax Commissioner, 210 Neb. 309, 314 N.W.2d 246 (1982).

This section provides for credit of any sales or use tax erroneously or illegally collected or computed. Anderson v. Tiemann, 182 Neb. 393, 155 N.W.2d 322 (1967).